test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_VV_makomii_gt-glossing.yaml
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmakmiinsminaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmakmiinyminaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmakmiinymiwaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmakmiinsminaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmakmiinsmiwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: makmiinymiwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4: makmiinymini
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: makmiinsmiwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4: makmiinsmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt: nmakmiinymiba
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmakmiinymidig
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: nmakmiinsmiba
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmakmiinsmidig
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt: gmakmiinymiba
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinymidig
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: gmakmiinsmiba
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinsmidig
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt: makmiinymiba
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: makmiinymidig
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: makmiinsmiba
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: makmiinsmidig
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt: makmiinymiba
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: makmiinymidig
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: makmiinsmiba
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: makmiinsmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+4: nmakmiinyman
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Loc: nmakmiinyming
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pl: nmakmiinyman
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+4: nmakmiinsman
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: nmakmiinsming
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: nmakmiinsman
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+4: gmakmiinyman
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Loc: gmakmiinyming
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pl: gmakmiinyman
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+4: gmakmiinsman
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: gmakmiinsming
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: gmakmiinsman
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+4: makmiinyman
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Loc: makmiinyming
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pl: makmiinyman
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+4: makmiinsman
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: makmiinsming
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: makmiinsman
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+4: makmiinyman
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Loc: makmiinyming
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pl: makmiinyman
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+4: makmiinsman
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: makmiinsming
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: makmiinsman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl: nmakmiinyshinaa
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: nmakmiinsshinaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl: gmakmiinyshinaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl: gmakmiinyshiwaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: gmakmiinsshinaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: gmakmiinsshiwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl: makmiinyshiwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+3+4: makmiinyshini
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: makmiinsshiwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4: makmiinsshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: nmakmiinyshiba
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmakmiinyshidig
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: nmakmiinsshiba
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmakmiinsshidig
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: gmakmiinyshiba
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinyshidig
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: gmakmiinsshiba
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinsshidig
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: makmiinyshiba
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: makmiinyshidig
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: makmiinsshiba
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: makmiinsshidig
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: makmiinyshiba
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: makmiinyshidig
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: makmiinsshiba
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: makmiinsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+4: nmakmiinyshan
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: nmakmiinyshing
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: nmakmiinyshan
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+4: nmakmiinsshan
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: nmakmiinsshing
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: nmakmiinsshan
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+4: gmakmiinyshan
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: gmakmiinyshing
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: gmakmiinyshan
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+4: gmakmiinsshan
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: gmakmiinsshing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: gmakmiinsshan
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+4: makmiinyshan
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: makmiinyshing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: makmiinyshan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+4: makmiinsshan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: makmiinsshing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: makmiinsshan
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+4: makmiinyshan
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: makmiinyshing
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: makmiinyshan
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+4: makmiinsshan
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: makmiinsshing
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: makmiinsshan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt: nmakmiinynaanba
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakmiinynaandig
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: nmakmiinsnaanba
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakmiinsnaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt: gmakmiinynaanba
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinynaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt: gmakmiinywaaba
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinywaadig
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: gmakmiinsnaanba
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinsnaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: gmakmiinswaaba
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinswaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt: makmiinywaaba
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makmiinywaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+3+4+Prt: makmiinyniwba
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl: makmiinyniwdig
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: makmiinswaaba
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makmiinswaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt: makmiinsniwba
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl: makmiinsniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+4: nmakmiinynaanin
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Loc: nmakmiinynaaning
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Pl: nmakmiinynaanin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+4: nmakmiinsnaanin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: nmakmiinsnaaning
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: nmakmiinsnaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+4: gmakmiinynaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Loc: gmakmiinynaaning
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl+Pl: gmakmiinynaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+4: gmakmiinywaan
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Loc: gmakmiinywaang
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Pl: gmakmiinywaan
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+4: gmakmiinsnaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: gmakmiinsnaaning
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: gmakmiinsnaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+4: gmakmiinswaan
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: gmakmiinswaang
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: gmakmiinswaan
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+4: makmiinywaan
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Loc: makmiinywaang
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl+Pl: makmiinywaan
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+3+4+4: makmiinyniwan
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+3+4+Loc: makmiinyniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+3+4+Pl: makmiinyniwan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+4: makmiinswaan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: makmiinswaang
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: makmiinswaan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+3+4+4: makmiinsniwan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+3+4+Loc: makmiinsniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+3+4+Pl: makmiinsniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+4: nmakmiinybaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinybaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinybaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+4: nmakmiinsbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinsbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinsbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+4: gmakmiinybaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinybaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinybaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+4: gmakmiinsbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinsbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinsbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+4: makmiinybaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: makmiinybaniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: makmiinybaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+4: makmiinsbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: makmiinsbaniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: makmiinsbaniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+4: makmiinybaniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: makmiinybaniing
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: makmiinybaniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+4: makmiinsbaniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: makmiinsbaniing
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: makmiinsbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nmakmiimshinaa
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gmakmiimshinaa
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gmakmiimshiwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: makmiimshiwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: makmiimshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nmakmiimshiba
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmakmiimshidig
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gmakmiimshiba
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmakmiimshidig
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: makmiimshiba
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: makmiimshidig
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: makmiimshiba
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: makmiimshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: nmakmiimshan
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nmakmiimshing
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nmakmiimshan
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: gmakmiimshan
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gmakmiimshing
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gmakmiimshan
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: makmiimshan
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: makmiimshing
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: makmiimshan
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: makmiimshan
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: makmiimshing
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: makmiimshan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: nmakmiimnaanba
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakmiimnaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gmakmiimnaanba
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiimnaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gmakmiimwaaba
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiimwaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: makmiimwaaba
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makmiimwaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: makmiimniwba
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Voc+Pl: makmiimniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: nmakmiimnaanin
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: nmakmiimnaaning
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: nmakmiimnaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gmakmiimnaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gmakmiimnaaning
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gmakmiimnaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gmakmiimwaan
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gmakmiimwaang
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gmakmiimwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: makmiimwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: makmiimwaang
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: makmiimwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+3+4+4: makmiimniwan
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: makmiimniing
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Pl: makmiimniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: nmakmiimbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nmakmiimbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nmakmiimbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: gmakmiimbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gmakmiimbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gmakmiimbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: makmiimbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: makmiimbaniing
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: makmiimbaniin
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: makmiimbaniin
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: makmiimbaniing
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: makmiimbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmakmiishnaanba
     1+mkomii+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakmiishnaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmakmiishnaanba
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiishnaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmakmiishwaaba
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiishwaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: makmiishwaaba
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makmiishwaadig
